Washington statutes.
RCW 36.70.730

Text without map.

The text of a zoning ordinance may be prepared and adopted in the absence of a comprehensive plan providing no zoning map or portion of a zoning map may be adopted thereunder until there has been compliance with the provisions of RCW 36.70.720.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.70.730. Prior: 1959 c 201 s 73.]